Illinois, session 104th, HB2639.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 15-175 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/15-175)7    Sec. 15-175. General homestead exemption. 8    (a) Except as provided in Sections 15-176 and 15-177, 9homestead property is entitled to an annual homestead 10exemption limited, except as described here with relation to 11cooperatives or life care facilities, to a reduction in the 12equalized assessed value of homestead property equal to the 13increase in equalized assessed value for the current 14assessment year above the equalized assessed value of the 15property for 1977, up to the maximum reduction set forth 16below. If however, the 1977 equalized assessed value upon 17which taxes were paid is subsequently determined by local 18assessing officials, the Property Tax Appeal Board, or a court 19to have been excessive, the equalized assessed value which 20should have been placed on the property for 1977 shall be used 21to determine the amount of the exemption.22    (b) Except as provided in Section 15-176, the maximum 23reduction before taxable year 2004 shall be $4,500 in counties   HB2639- 2 -LRB104 09751 HLH 19817 b1with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $3,500 in all other 2counties. Except as provided in Sections 15-176 and 15-177, 3for taxable years 2004 through 2007, the maximum reduction 4shall be $5,000, for taxable year 2008, the maximum reduction 5is $5,500, and, for taxable years 2009 through 2011, the 6maximum reduction is $6,000 in all counties. For taxable years 72012 through 2016, the maximum reduction is $7,000 in counties 8with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants and $6,000 in all other 9counties. For taxable years 2017 through 2022, the maximum 10reduction is $10,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more 11inhabitants and $6,000 in all other counties. For taxable 12years 2023 through 2025 and thereafter, the maximum reduction 13is $10,000 in counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 14$8,000 in counties that are contiguous to a county of 153,000,000 or more inhabitants, and $6,000 in all other 16counties. For taxable years 2026 and thereafter, the maximum 17reduction is $10,000 in all counties. If a county has elected 18to subject itself to the provisions of Section 15-176 as 19provided in subsection (k) of that Section, then, for the 20first taxable year only after the provisions of Section 15-176 21no longer apply, for owners who, for the taxable year, have not 22been granted a senior citizens assessment freeze homestead 23exemption under Section 15-172 or a long-time occupant 24homestead exemption under Section 15-177, there shall be an 25additional exemption of $5,000 for owners with a household 26income of $30,000 or less.   HB2639- 3 -LRB104 09751 HLH 19817 b1    (c) In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, if, 2based on the most recent assessment, the equalized assessed 3value of the homestead property for the current assessment 4year is greater than the equalized assessed value of the 5property for 1977, the owner of the property shall 6automatically receive the exemption granted under this Section 7in an amount equal to the increase over the 1977 assessment up 8to the maximum reduction set forth in this Section.9    (d) If in any assessment year beginning with the 2000 10assessment year, homestead property has a pro-rata valuation 11under Section 9-180 resulting in an increase in the assessed 12valuation, a reduction in equalized assessed valuation equal 13to the increase in equalized assessed value of the property 14for the year of the pro-rata valuation above the equalized 15assessed value of the property for 1977 shall be applied to the 16property on a proportionate basis for the period the property 17qualified as homestead property during the assessment year. 18The maximum proportionate homestead exemption shall not exceed 19the maximum homestead exemption allowed in the county under 20this Section divided by 365 and multiplied by the number of 21days the property qualified as homestead property.22    (d-1) In counties with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, 23where the chief county assessment officer provides a notice of 24discovery, if a property is not occupied by its owner as a 25principal residence as of January 1 of the current tax year, 26then the property owner shall notify the chief county   HB2639- 4 -LRB104 09751 HLH 19817 b1assessment officer of that fact on a form prescribed by the 2chief county assessment officer. That notice must be received 3by the chief county assessment officer on or before March 1 of 4the collection year. If mailed, the form shall be sent by 5certified mail, return receipt requested. If the form is 6provided in person, the chief county assessment officer shall 7provide a date stamped copy of the notice. Failure to provide 8timely notice pursuant to this subsection (d-1) shall result 9in the exemption being treated as an erroneous exemption. Upon 10timely receipt of the notice for the current tax year, no 11exemption shall be applied to the property for the current tax 12year. If the exemption is not removed upon timely receipt of 13the notice by the chief assessment officer, then the error is 14considered granted as a result of a clerical error or omission 15on the part of the chief county assessment officer as 16described in subsection (h) of Section 9-275, and the property 17owner shall not be liable for the payment of interest and 18penalties due to the erroneous exemption for the current tax 19year for which the notice was filed after the date that notice 20was timely received pursuant to this subsection. Notice 21provided under this subsection shall not constitute a defense 22or amnesty for prior year erroneous exemptions. 23    For the purposes of this subsection (d-1): 24    "Collection year" means the year in which the first and 25second installment of the current tax year is billed. 26    "Current tax year" means the year prior to the collection   HB2639- 5 -LRB104 09751 HLH 19817 b1year. 2    (e) The chief county assessment officer may, when 3considering whether to grant a leasehold exemption under this 4Section, require the following conditions to be met: 5        (1) that a notarized application for the exemption, 6    signed by both the owner and the lessee of the property, 7    must be submitted each year during the application period 8    in effect for the county in which the property is located; 9        (2) that a copy of the lease must be filed with the 10    chief county assessment officer by the owner of the 11    property at the time the notarized application is 12    submitted;13        (3) that the lease must expressly state that the 14    lessee is liable for the payment of property taxes; and 15        (4) that the lease must include the following language 16    in substantially the following form: 17            "Lessee shall be liable for the payment of real 18        estate taxes with respect to the residence in 19        accordance with the terms and conditions of Section 20        15-175 of the Property Tax Code (35 ILCS 200/15-175). 21        The permanent real estate index number for the 22        premises is (insert number), and, according to the 23        most recent property tax bill, the current amount of 24        real estate taxes associated with the premises is 25        (insert amount) per year. The parties agree that the 26        monthly rent set forth above shall be increased or   HB2639- 6 -LRB104 09751 HLH 19817 b1        decreased pro rata (effective January 1 of each 2        calendar year) to reflect any increase or decrease in 3        real estate taxes. Lessee shall be deemed to be 4        satisfying Lessee's liability for the above mentioned 5        real estate taxes with the monthly rent payments as 6        set forth above (or increased or decreased as set 7        forth herein).". 8    In addition, if there is a change in lessee, or if the 9lessee vacates the property, then the chief county assessment 10officer may require the owner of the property to notify the 11chief county assessment officer of that change. 12    This subsection (e) does not apply to leasehold interests 13in property owned by a municipality. 14    (f) "Homestead property" under this Section includes 15residential property that is occupied by its owner or owners 16as his or their principal dwelling place, or that is a 17leasehold interest on which a single family residence is 18situated, which is occupied as a residence by a person who has 19an ownership interest therein, legal or equitable or as a 20lessee, and on which the person is liable for the payment of 21property taxes. For land improved with an apartment building 22owned and operated as a cooperative, the maximum reduction 23from the equalized assessed value shall be limited to the 24increase in the value above the equalized assessed value of 25the property for 1977, up to the maximum reduction set forth 26above, multiplied by the number of apartments or units   HB2639- 7 -LRB104 09751 HLH 19817 b1occupied by a person or persons who is liable, by contract with 2the owner or owners of record, for paying property taxes on the 3property and is an owner of record of a legal or equitable 4interest in the cooperative apartment building, other than a 5leasehold interest. For land improved with a life care 6facility, the maximum reduction from the value of the 7property, as equalized by the Department, shall be multiplied 8by the number of apartments or units occupied by a person or 9persons, irrespective of any legal, equitable, or leasehold 10interest in the facility, who are liable, under a life care 11contract with the owner or owners of record of the facility, 12for paying property taxes on the property. For purposes of 13this Section, the term "life care facility" has the meaning 14stated in Section 15-170.15    "Household", as used in this Section, means the owner, the 16spouse of the owner, and all persons using the residence of the 17owner as their principal place of residence.18    "Household income", as used in this Section, means the 19combined income of the members of a household for the calendar 20year preceding the taxable year.21    "Income", as used in this Section, has the same meaning as 22provided in Section 3.07 of the Senior Citizens and Persons 23with Disabilities Property Tax Relief Act, except that 24"income" does not include veteran's benefits. 25    (g) In a cooperative or life care facility where a 26homestead exemption has been granted, the cooperative   HB2639- 8 -LRB104 09751 HLH 19817 b1association or the management of the cooperative or life care 2facility shall credit the savings resulting from that 3exemption only to the apportioned tax liability of the owner 4or resident who qualified for the exemption. Any person who 5willfully refuses to so credit the savings shall be guilty of a 6Class B misdemeanor. 7    (h) Where married persons maintain and reside in separate 8residences qualifying as homestead property, each residence 9shall receive 50% of the total reduction in equalized assessed 10valuation provided by this Section.11    (i) In all counties, the assessor or chief county 12assessment officer may determine the eligibility of 13residential property to receive the homestead exemption and 14the amount of the exemption by application, visual inspection, 15questionnaire or other reasonable methods. The determination 16shall be made in accordance with guidelines established by the 17Department, provided that the taxpayer applying for an 18additional general exemption under this Section shall submit 19to the chief county assessment officer an application with an 20affidavit of the applicant's total household income, age, 21marital status (and, if married, the name and address of the 22applicant's spouse, if known), and principal dwelling place of 23members of the household on January 1 of the taxable year. The 24Department shall issue guidelines establishing a method for 25verifying the accuracy of the affidavits filed by applicants 26under this paragraph. The applications shall be clearly marked   HB2639- 9 -LRB104 09751 HLH 19817 b1as applications for the Additional General Homestead 2Exemption. 3    (i-5) This subsection (i-5) applies to counties with 43,000,000 or more inhabitants. In the event of a sale of 5homestead property, the homestead exemption shall remain in 6effect for the remainder of the assessment year of the sale. 7Upon receipt of a transfer declaration transmitted by the 8recorder pursuant to Section 31-30 of the Real Estate Transfer 9Tax Law for property receiving an exemption under this 10Section, the assessor shall mail a notice and forms to the new 11owner of the property providing information pertaining to the 12rules and applicable filing periods for applying or reapplying 13for homestead exemptions under this Code for which the 14property may be eligible. If the new owner fails to apply or 15reapply for a homestead exemption during the applicable filing 16period or the property no longer qualifies for an existing 17homestead exemption, the assessor shall cancel such exemption 18for any ensuing assessment year. 19    (j) In counties with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants, in 20the event of a sale of homestead property the homestead 21exemption shall remain in effect for the remainder of the 22assessment year of the sale. The assessor or chief county 23assessment officer may require the new owner of the property 24to apply for the homestead exemption for the following 25assessment year.26    (k) Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 8 of the State Mandates   HB2639- 10 -LRB104 09751 HLH 19817 b1Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for the 2implementation of any mandate created by this Section. 3    (l) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 4Act of the 100th General Assembly are effective for the 2018 5tax year and thereafter. 6(Source: P.A. 102-895, eff. 5-23-22.) 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.